th: Shapesทรงหนามแหลม: ว่าง; ต้นคริสต์มาส; ทรงกรวย; ทรงหกเหลี่ยม; ไฮบริด; ทรงเข็ม; ทรงพีระมิด; สตั๊ด; ทาร์ทัน; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Forma do pitão: Em branco; Árvore de Natal; Cone; Hexagonal; Híbrido; Agulha; Pirâmide; Pitão; Tartan; Outro
zh-TW: 鞋釘形狀: 盲釘; 聖誕樹形; 圓錐形; 六角形; 混合形; 針形; 金字塔形; 柱形; 塔坦形; 其他
nl: Spike vorm: Blanco; Kerstboom; Kegel; Zeshoekig; Hybride; Naald; Piramide; Noppen; Tartan; Overige
cs: Tvar hrotu: Záslepka; Stromeček; Kužel; Šestihran; Hybridní; Jehla; Pyramida; Kolík; Tartan; Jiné
ru: Форма шипа: Заглушка; Елочка; Конус; Шестигранник; Гибрид; Игла; Пирамида; Шип; Тартан; Другое
ro-RO: Forma cramponului: Gol; Brad de Crăciun; Con; Hexagonal; Hibrid; Ac; Piramidă; Cui; Tartan; Altele
sk-SK: Tvary hrotov: Záslepka; Vianočný stromček; Kužeľ; Šesťuholník; Hybridný; Ihla; Pyramída; Kolík; Tartanový; Iný
en: Spike shape: Blank; Christmas tree; Cone; Hexagonal; Hybrid; Needle; Pyramid; Stud; Tartan; Other
ko: 스파이크 모양: 블랭크; 크리스마스 트리; 원뿔형; 육각형; 하이브리드; 바늘형; 피라미드형; 스터드; 타탄; 기타
de: Form des Spikes: Blank; Tannenbaum; Kegel; Hexagonal; Hybrid; Nadel; Pyramide; Stollen; Tartan; Sonstige
pt-BR: Cravo formato: Liso; Árvore de Natal; Cone; Hexagonal; Híbrido; Agulha; Pirâmide; Cravo; Tartan; Outros
bg-BG: Форма на шипа: Празен; Коледна елха; Конус; Шестоъгълна; Хибридна; Игла; Пирамида; Бутон; Тартан; Друго
pl: Kształt kolców: Puste; Choinka; Stożek; Sześciokątne; Hybrydowe; Igła; Piramida; Kołek; Tartanowe; Inne
zh-CN: 尖刺形状: 盲钉; 圣诞树形; 锥形; 六角形; 混合形; 针形; 金字塔形; 饰钉; 塔坦形（Tartan）; 其他
es: Forma del tapón: Ciego; Árbol de Navidad; Cono; Hexagonal; Híbrido; Aguja; Pirámide; Taco; Tartán; Otro
lt-LT: Dyglių forma: Aklė; Eglutės formos; Kūgis; Šešiakampis; Hibridinis; Adatos formos; Piramidės formos; Dyglis; Tartano; Kita
sv: Spikens form: Blank; Julgran; Kon; Sexkantig; Hybrid; Nål; Pyramid; Dobb; Tartan; Annat
nb: Piggform: Blank; Juletre; Kjegle; Sekskantet; Hybrid; Nål; Pyramide; Knott; Tartan; Annet
hu: Tüske formája: Vak; Karácsonyfa; Kúp; Hatszögletű; Hibrid; Tű; Piramis; Stopli; Tartán; Egyéb
hr-HR: Oblici Shapes: Čep; Božićno drvce; Konus; Šesterokut; Hibrid; Igla; Piramida; Čep; Tartan; Ostalo
vi: Hình dạng gai: Trống; Cây thông Noel; Hình nón; Lục giác; Lai; Hình kim; Hình chóp; Đinh tán; Tartan; Khác
fr: Forme des pointes: Plat; Sapin de Noël; Cône; Hexagonal; Hybride; Aiguille; Pyramide; Crampon; Tartan; Autre
ja: スパイク形状: ブランク; クリスマスツリー; コーン; 六角; ハイブリッド; ニードル; ピラミッド; スタッド; タータン; その他
fi: Piikin muoto: Aihio; Joulukuusi; Kartio; Kuusikulmainen; Hybridi; Neula; Pyramidi; Nasta; Tartan; Muu
da: Pigform: Blank; Juletræ; Kegle; Sekskantet; Hybrid; Nål; Pyramide; Knop; Tartan; Andet
it: Forma dei tacchetti: Piatto; Ad albero di Natale; A cono; Esagonale; Ibrido; Ad ago; A piramide; A tacchetto; Tartan; Altro
tr: Çivi uç şekli: Boş; Çam ağacı; Koni; Altıgen; Hibrit; İğne; Piramit; Çivi; Tartan; Diğer
el: Σχήμα καρφιού: Κενό; Χριστουγεννιάτικο δέντρο; Κώνος; Εξαγωνικό; Υβριδικό; Βελόνα; Πυραμίδα; Τρουκ; Ταρτάν; Άλλο
sl-SI: Oblika žebljička: Prazno; Oblika smrečice; Stožec; Šestkotnik; Hibrid; Igla; Piramida; Čep; Tartan; Drugo